Connecticut, session 2026, HB05216.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Department of
Education shall establish a program to be known as the "Student
Teacher Investment and Professional Educator Network for
Development" or "STIPEND" program. For the fall semester of 2026, and
each semester thereafter, the department shall provide funds to each
teacher preparation program, as defined in section 10-10a of the general
statutes, for each student teacher enrolled in such program who is
participating in a student teaching experience, pursuant to subsection
(i) of section 10-145a of the general statutes, at a public school in the state
for such semester. Such funds shall be in an amount equal to one
thousand dollars per week of such student teaching experience for each
such student teacher. The department shall request reimbursement, on
a pro rata basis, from any teacher preparation program that reports,
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section, any such
student teaching experience as uncompleted.
(b) (1) Each teacher preparation program shall report to the
LCO 1376 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5216
Department of Education, in the form and manner prescribed by the
department, (A) not later that August 1, 2026, and December 1, 2026,
and each August first and December first thereafter, the estimated
number of student teachers who are enrolled in such program and will
participate in a student teaching experience at a public school in the state
during the following semester, and (B) not later than January 1, 2027,
and July 1, 2027, and each January first and July first thereafter, whether
any such student teachers did not complete such student teaching
experience during the prior semester, specifying the number of weeks
that were not completed.
(2) Upon receipt of the funds pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section, each teacher preparation program shall disburse stipends to
each student teacher who is participating in a student teaching
experience at a public school in the state for such semester in the amount
specified in subsection (a) of this section, provided such student teacher
shall return such stipend, on a pro rata basis, for any uncompleted
weeks of such student teaching experience.
(c) The Department of Education shall monitor the employment
status of each student teacher who received a stipend under the
STIPEND program for not fewer than three years after such student
teacher graduates from the teacher preparation program. The
department shall request reimbursement from any such student teacher
who is not employed as a certified teacher in a public school in the state
for at least two years after graduation from the teacher preparation
program, in an amount not less than fifty per cent of the total stipends
such student teacher received under the STIPEND program.
(d) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
Department of Education shall submit, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to education a report, on a disaggregated basis, on the
employment rate at public schools in the state of student teachers who
received stipends under the STIPEND program.
LCO 1376 2 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5216
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
ED Joint Favorable C/R APP
LCO 1376 3 of 3